District of Columbia statutes.
48-844.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “SafeRX Evaluation Act of 2008”.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 501, 55 DCR 1659
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 17-131, the SafeRX Amendment Act of 2008, see Mayor’s Order 2008-94, July 3, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9375).